Washington statutes.
RCW 31.45.040

Application for license or small loan endorsement—Financial responsibility—Director's investigation.

(1) The director shall conduct an investigation of every applicant to determine the financial responsibility, experience, character, and general fitness of the applicant. The director shall issue the applicant a license to engage in the business of cashing or selling checks, or both, or a small loan endorsement, if the director determines to his or her satisfaction that:

(a) The applicant has satisfied the requirements of RCW 31.45.030;

(b) The applicant is financially responsible and appears to be able to conduct the business of cashing or selling checks or making small loans in an honest, fair, and efficient manner with the confidence and trust of the community; and

(c) The applicant has the required bonds, or has provided an acceptable alternative form of financial security.

(2) The director may refuse to issue a license or small loan endorsement if he or she finds that the applicant, or any person who is a director, officer, partner, agent, sole proprietor, owner, or controlling person of the applicant, has been convicted of a felony in any jurisdiction within seven years of filing the present application or is associating or consorting with any person who has been convicted of a felony in any jurisdiction within seven years of filing the present application. The term "substantial stockholder" as used in this subsection, means a person owning or controlling ten percent or more of the total outstanding shares of the applicant corporation.

(3) A license or small loan endorsement may not be issued to an applicant:

(a) Whose license to conduct business under this chapter, or any similar statute in any other jurisdiction, has been suspended or revoked within five years of the filing of the present application;

(b) Who has been banned from the industry by an administrative order issued by the director or the director's designee, for the period specified in the administrative order; or

(c) When any person who is a sole proprietor, owner, director, officer, partner, agent, or controlling person of the applicant has been banned from the industry in an administrative order issued by the director, for the period specified in the administrative order.

(4) A license or small loan endorsement issued under this chapter shall be conspicuously posted in the place of business of the licensee. The license is not transferable or assignable.

(5) A license or small loan endorsement issued in accordance with this chapter remains in force and effect until surrendered, suspended, or revoked, or until the license expires as a result of nonpayment of the annual assessment fee.

[ 2003 c 86 s 4; 1996 c 13 s 1; 1995 c 18 s 5; 1994 c 92 s 277; 1991 c 355 s 4.]